Maryland, session 2025, HB0173.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–415.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN BALTIMORE COUNTY.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT OF RECREATION AND PARKS OF BALTIMORE
COUNTY SHALL ESTABLISH A DEER MANAGEMENT PROGRAM TO MANAGE DEER
POPULATION ON COUNTY PARKLANDS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0173*